California statutes. Penal Code
The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not charge a fee for an incarcerated person to request, review, or use their medical records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 837, Sec. 1.   (SB 1139)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.7.

An inmate who has maintained an inmate trust account with twenty-five dollars ($25) or less for 30 consecutive days shall be deemed indigent. An indigent inmate shall receive basic supplies necessary for maintaining personal hygiene. An indigent inmate shall be provided with sufficient resources to communicate with and access the courts, including, but not limited to, stamps, writing materials, envelopes, paper, and the services of a notary for the purpose of notarizing a signature on a document, as required.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 764, Sec. 1.   (AB 2533)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.9.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not charge a fee for durable medical equipment or medical supplies provided to an inmate confined in the state prison as medically necessary to ensure the inmate has equal access to prison services, programs, or activities.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “durable medical equipment” means equipment that is prescribed by a licensed provider to meet the medical needs of an inmate and that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The equipment can withstand repeated use.

(B) The equipment is used to serve a medical
 purpose.

(C) The equipment is not normally useful to an individual in the absence of an illness, injury, functional impairment, or congenital anomaly.

(D) The equipment is appropriate for use in or out of the prison.

(2) Durable medical equipment includes, but is not limited to, eyeglasses, artificial eyes, dentures, artificial limbs, orthopedic braces and shoes, and hearing aids.

(c) For purposes of this section, “medical supplies” means supplies that are prescribed by a licensed provider to meet the medical needs of an inmate and that meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The supplies cannot withstand repeated use.

(2) The supplies are usually disposable in nature.

(3) The supplies are used to serve a medical purpose.

(4) The supplies are not normally useful to an individual in the absence of an illness, injury, functional impairment, or congenital anomaly.

(5) The supplies are intended for use in an outpatient setting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 570, Sec. 6.   (AB 45)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.

The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall deposit any funds of inmates in his or her possession in trust with the Treasurer pursuant to Section 16305.3 of the Government Code. However, the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall deposit those funds of inmates in interest-bearing bank accounts or invest or reinvest the funds in any of the securities that are described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code and for the purposes of
 deposit or investment only may mingle the funds of any inmate with the funds of other inmates. Any interest or increment accruing on those funds, less expenses incurred in the investment, shall be deposited in individual inmate or parolee trust accounts on a proportional basis depending upon the amount of funds each individual inmate or parolee account has on deposit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.1.

Subject to the availability of adequate state funding for these purposes, the Director of Corrections shall provide all inmates at each penal institution and prison facility under the jurisdiction of the department with information about behavior that places a person at high risk for contracting the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), and about the prevention of transmission of acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS). The director shall provide all inmates, who are within one month of release or being placed on parole, with information about agencies and facilities that provide testing, counseling, medical, and support services for AIDS victims.
 Information about AIDS prevention shall be solicited by the director from the State Department of Health Services, the county health officer, or local agencies providing services to persons with AIDS. The Director of Health Services, or his or her designee, shall approve protocols pertaining to the information to be disseminated under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1301, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.2.

(a) During the intake medical examination or intake health screening, or while providing general information during intake, the department shall provide all inmates with information on hepatitis C, including, but not limited to, methods of hepatitis C transmission and prevention, and information on opportunities for screening and treatment while incarcerated. This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that brochures, other printed information, or other media is provided at no charge to the department by public health agencies or any other organization promoting hepatitis C education.

(b) The department shall also provide hepatitis C screening to all inmates who request it, and offer it to inmates that have a
 history of intravenous drug use or other risk factors for hepatitis C. This testing shall be confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 570, Sec. 7.   (AB 45)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that all prisoners shall be afforded reasonable opportunities to exercise religious freedom.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that all prisoners shall be afforded religious grooming, clothing, and headwear accommodations in accordance with Section 2607.

(b) (1) Except in extraordinary circumstances, upon the transfer of an inmate to another state prison institution, any member of the clergy or spiritual adviser who has been previously authorized by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to
 visit that inmate shall be granted visitation privileges at the institution to which the inmate is transferred within 72 hours of the transfer.

(2) Visitations by members of the clergy or spiritual advisers shall be subject to the same rules, regulations, and policies relating to general visitations applicable at the institution to which the inmate is transferred.

(3) A departmental or volunteer chaplain who has ministered to or advised an inmate incarcerated in state prison may, voluntarily and without compensation, continue to minister to or advise the inmate while they are on parole, provided that the departmental or volunteer chaplain so notifies the warden and the parolee’s parole agent in writing.

(c) Nothing in this section limits the department’s ability to prohibit a departmental chaplain from ministering to a parolee, or to exclude a volunteer chaplain from department facilities, if either is found to be in violation of any law or regulation and that violation would ordinarily be grounds for adverse action or denial of access to a facility or person under the department’s custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 388, Sec. 4.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the predominant purpose of exercise in correctional facilities should be for the maintenance of the general health and welfare of inmates and that exercise equipment and programs in correctional facilities should be consistent with this purpose.

The Legislature further finds and declares that in some cases it may be beneficial to provide access to weights for therapeutic or rehabilitative reasons under a doctor’s order or for certain vocational
 activities such as firefighting.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that both the Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority eliminate or restrict access to weights and weight lifting equipment where it is determined that the particular type of equipment involved or the particular prison population or inmate involved poses a safety concern both in the correctional facility and to the public upon release. In those instances where inmates are allowed access to weights and weight lifting equipment, access shall be a privilege.

As a condition of inmate access to weights and weight lifting equipment, the departments may require inmates to participate in training in the proper use of weights and weight lifting equipment that emphasizes departmental rules and safety practices that must be observed when using weights and weight lifting equipment.

The directors of the departments, or their respective designees, may restrict individual or group access to weights and weight lifting equipment as deemed necessary for the orderly operation of the correctional facility.

(c) On or before July 1, 1995, both the Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority shall adopt regulations governing inmate access to weight lifting and weight training equipment in state prison and California Youth Authority facilities, respectively. In developing these regulations, the departments shall consider each of the following:

(1) Some prisoners may utilize weight equipment to develop strength and increase body mass and size rather than for the maintenance of general health. This use of weight equipment may create a risk of harm to other inmates, correctional officers, and staff and, upon
 release, to law enforcement officers and the general public.

(2) The improper use of weights and weight lifting equipment may result in injuries that require costly medical attention.

(3) Access to weights and weight lifting equipment by inmates may result in the use of the equipment by inmates to attack other inmates or correctional officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.

(a) The Department of Corrections shall not require, as a condition for any form of treatment or custody that the department offers, an admission of guilt to any crime for which an inmate was committed to the custody of the department.

(b) The Board of Prison Terms shall not require, when setting parole dates, an admission of guilt to any crime for which an inmate was committed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

5021.

(a) Any death that occurs in any facility operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the State Department of State Hospitals, a city, county, or city and county, including county juvenile facilities, or any facility which is under contract with any of these entities for the incarceration, rehabilitation, holding, or treatment of persons accused or convicted of crimes, shall be reported
 within a reasonable time, not to exceed two hours, of its discovery by authorities in the facility to the county sheriff, or his or her designated representative, and to the coroner’s office, of the county in which the facility is located, as provided in Section 27491 of the Government Code. These deaths shall also be reported to the district attorney, or his or her designated representative, of the county in which the facility is located as soon as a representative of the district attorney’s office is on duty. If the facility is located within the city limits of an incorporated city, the report shall also be made to the chief of police in that city, or to his or her designated representative, within a reasonable time, not to exceed two hours, of its discovery.

Any death of a person in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall also be reported to the Chief of Medical Services in the Central Office of the Department of Corrections
 and Rehabilitation, or his or her designated representative, as soon as a representative of that office is on duty.

(b) The initial report of the death of a person required in subdivision (a) may be transmitted by telephone, direct contact, or by written notification, and shall outline all pertinent facts known at the time the report is made and all persons to contact, in addition to any other information the reporting person or officer deems pertinent.

(c) The initial report of the death of a person as required in subdivision (a) shall be supplemented by a written report, which shall be submitted to the entities listed in subdivision (a) within eight hours of the discovery of the death. This written report shall include all circumstances and details of the death that were known at the time the report was prepared, and shall include the names of all persons involved in the death,
 and all persons with knowledge of the circumstances surrounding the death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 49.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.

(a) Upon the entry of a prisoner into a facility operated by the Department of Corrections, and at least every year thereafter, the Director of Corrections shall obtain from the prisoner the name and last known address and telephone number of any person or persons who shall be notified in the event of the prisoner’s death or serious illness or serious injury, as determined by the physician in attendance, and who are authorized to receive his or her body. The persons shall be noted in the order of the prisoner’s preference. The Director of
 Corrections shall provide the prisoner with the opportunity to modify or amend his or her notification list at any time.

(b) The Director of Corrections shall use all reasonable means to contact the person or persons set forth in the notification list upon the death or serious illness or serious injury, as determined by the physician in attendance, of the prisoner while confined in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 211, Sec. 1.   Effective July 26, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Corrections operate in the most cost-effective and efficient manner possible when purchasing health care services for inmates. To achieve this goal, it is desirable that the department have the benefit and experience of the California Medical Assistance Commission in planning and negotiating for the purchase of health care services.

(b) The Department of Corrections shall consult with the commission to assist the
 department in planning and negotiating contracts for the purchase of health care services. The commission shall advise the department, and may negotiate directly with providers on behalf of the department, as mutually agreed upon by the commission and the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 749, Sec. 9.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.2.

(a) In order to promote the best possible patient outcomes, eliminate unnecessary medical and pharmacy costs, and ensure consistency in the delivery of health care services, the department shall maintain a statewide utilization management program that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Objective, evidence-based
 medical necessity criteria and utilization guidelines.

(2) The review, approval, and oversight of referrals to specialty medical services.

(3) The management and oversight of community hospital bed usage and supervision of health care bed availability.

(4) Case management processes for high medical risk and high medical cost patients.

(5) A preferred provider organization (PPO) and related contract initiatives that improve the coverage, resource allocation, and quality of contract medical providers and facilities.

(b) The department shall develop and implement policies and procedures to ensure that all adult prisons employ the same statewide utilization management program established
 pursuant to subdivision (a) that supports the department’s goals for cost-effective auditable patient outcomes, access to care, an effective and accessible specialty network, and prompt access to hospital and infirmary resources. The department shall provide a copy of these policies and procedures, by July 1, 2011, to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Senate Committee on Health, the Senate Committee on Public Safety, the Assembly Committee on Appropriations, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Assembly Committee on Health, and the Assembly Committee on Public Safety.

(c) (1) The department shall establish annual quantitative utilization management performance objectives to promote greater consistency in the delivery of contract health care services, enhance health care quality outcomes, and reduce unnecessary referrals to
 contract medical services. On July 1, 2011, the department shall report the specific quantitative utilization management performance objectives it intends to accomplish statewide in each adult prison during the next 12 months to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Senate Committee on Health, the Senate Committee on Public Safety, the Assembly Committee on Appropriations, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Assembly Committee on Health, and the Assembly Committee on Public Safety.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2015, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(d) On March 1, 2012, and each March 1 thereafter, the department shall report all of the following to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the
 Senate Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Senate Committee on Health, the Senate Committee on Public Safety, the Assembly Committee on Appropriations, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Assembly Committee on Health, and the Assembly Committee on Public Safety:

(1) The extent to which the department achieved the statewide quantitative utilization management performance objectives set forth in the report issued the previous March as well as the most significant reasons for achieving or not achieving those performance objectives.

(2) A list of adult prisons that achieved and a list of adult prisons that did not achieve their quantitative utilization management performance objectives and the significant reasons for the success or failure in achieving those performance objectives at each adult state prison.

(3) The specific quantitative utilization management performance objectives the department and each adult state prison intends to accomplish in the next 12 months.

(4) A description of planned and implemented initiatives necessary to accomplish the next 12 months’ quantitative utilization management performance objectives statewide and for each adult state prison. The department shall describe initiatives that were considered and rejected and the reasons for their rejection.

(5) The costs for inmate health care for the previous fiscal year, both statewide and at each adult state prison, and a comparison of costs from the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year being reported both statewide and at each adult state prison.

(e) It is the intent of the
 Legislature that any activities the department undertakes to implement the provisions of this section shall result in no year-over-year net increase in state costs.

(f) The following definitions shall apply to this section:

(1) “Contract medical costs” mean costs associated with an approved contractual agreement for the purposes of providing direct and indirect specialty medical care services.

(2) “Specialty care” means medical services not delivered by primary care providers.

(3) “Utilization management program” means a strategy designed to ensure that health care expenditures are restricted to those that are needed and appropriate by reviewing patient-inmate medical records through the application of defined criteria or expert opinion, or both.
 Utilization management assesses the efficiency of the health care process and the appropriateness of decisionmaking in relation to the site of care, its frequency, and its duration through prospective, concurrent, and retrospective utilization reviews.

(4) “Community hospital” means an institution located within a city, county, or city and county which is licensed under all applicable state and local laws and regulations to provide diagnostic and therapeutic services for the medical diagnosis, treatment, and care of injured, disabled, or sick persons in need of acute inpatient medical, psychiatric, or psychological care.

(g) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (d) is inoperative on March 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 220.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may contract with providers of health care services and health care network providers, including, but not limited to, health plans, preferred provider organizations, and other health care network managers. Hospitals that do not contract with the department for emergency health care services shall provide these services to the department on the same basis as they are required to provide these services pursuant to Section 489.24 of Title 42 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations. The department may only reimburse a noncontract provider of hospital or physician services at a rate equal to or less than the amount payable under the Medicare Fee Schedule, regardless of whether the hospital is located within or outside of California.

(b) An entity that provides ambulance or any other emergency or nonemergency response service to the department, and that does not contract with the department for that service, shall be reimbursed for the service at the rate payable under the Medicare Fee Schedule, regardless of whether the provider is located within or outside of California.

(c) Until regulations or emergency regulations are adopted in accordance with subdivision (g), the department shall not reimburse a contract provider of hospital services at a rate that exceeds 130 percent of the amount payable under the Medicare Fee Schedule, a contract
 provider of physician services at a rate that exceeds 110 percent of the amount payable under the Medicare Fee Schedule, or a contract provider of ambulance services at a rate that exceeds 120 percent of the amount payable under the Medicare Fee Schedule. The maximum rates established by this subdivision shall not apply to reimbursement for administrative days, transplant services, services provided pursuant to competitively bid contracts, or services provided pursuant to a contract executed prior to September 1, 2009.

(d) The maximum rates set forth in this section shall not apply to contracts entered into through the department’s designated health care network provider, if any. The rates for those contracts shall be negotiated at the lowest rate possible under the circumstances.

(e) The department and its designated health care network provider may enter into exclusive or
 nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis for hospital, physician, and ambulance services contracts.

(f) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may adopt regulations to implement this section. During the existence of the receivership established in United States District Court for the Northern District of California, Case No. C01-1351 TEH, Plata v. Schwarzenegger, the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation authorized by this section is hereby exempted from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(g) The secretary may change the maximum rates set forth in this section by regulation or emergency regulation, adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, but no sooner than 30 days after notification
 to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Those changes may include, but are not limited to, increasing or decreasing rates, or adding location-based differentials such as those provided to small and rural hospitals as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the secretary is hereby exempted for this purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(h) During the existence of the receivership established in United States District Court for the Northern District of California, Case No. C01-1351 TEH, Plata v. Schwarzenegger, references in this section to the “secretary” shall mean the receiver appointed in that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 22, Sec. 31.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.6.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall, by January 1, 2011, do all of the following:

(1) Adopt industry standard claim forms for use by contract health care service providers.

(2) Be able to accept secure electronic submission of claims from contract health care service providers.

(3) Perform periodic audits of claims paid to contract health care providers.

(4) Provide secure, remote electronic access to claim status information to those contract health care service providers submitting claims electronically in the manner required by the department.

(b) The department may adopt policies and procedures for the purpose of enabling electronic health care claims management and processing. The adoption, amendment, or repeal of policies and procedures for this limited purpose are exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 669, Sec. 2.   (AB 1985)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, money recovered prior to July 1, 2011, from an overpayment of a medical contract expenditure, under the authority of the federal health care receiver, shall be credited to the fiscal year in which the expenditure was drawn. An amount not to exceed the total amount of the funds recovered shall be augmented to the appropriation to the department for the 2010–11 fiscal year, upon approval of the Department of
 Finance.

(b) Money recovered on or after July 1, 2011, from an overpayment of a medical contract expenditure, under the authority of the federal health care receiver, shall be credited to the fiscal year in which the expenditure was drawn. An amount not to exceed the amount of the overpayment shall be augmented to the appropriation to the department for the fiscal year in which the recovered funds are received, upon approval of the Department of Finance.

(c) Any money recovered and any adjustments to appropriations made pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days.

(d) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (c) is inoperative on January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 28.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) State costs for purchasing drugs and medical supplies for the health care of offenders in state custody have grown rapidly in recent years and will amount to almost seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) annually in the 1999–2000 fiscal year.

(2) The California State Auditor’s Office found in a January 2000 audit report that the state could save millions of dollars annually by improving its current processes for the procurement of drugs for inmate health care and by pursuing alternative procurement methods.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, in cooperation with the Department of General Services and other appropriate state agencies, take prompt action to adopt cost-effective reforms in its drug and medical supply procurement processes by establishing a program to obtain rebates from drug manufacturers, implementing alternative contracting and procurement reforms, or by some combination of these steps.

(b) (1) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation,
 pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) may adopt regulations requiring manufacturers of drugs to pay the department a rebate for the purchase of drugs for offenders in state custody that is at least equal to the rebate that would be applicable to the drug under Section 1927(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8(c)). Any such regulation shall, at a minimum, specify the procedures for notifying drug manufacturers of the rebate requirements and for collecting rebate payments.

(2) If a rebate program is implemented, the secretary shall develop, maintain, and update as necessary a list of drugs to be provided under the rebate program, and establish a rate structure for reimbursement of each drug included in the rebate program. Rates shall not be less than the actual cost of the drug. However, the secretary may
 purchase a listed drug directly from the manufacturer and negotiate the most favorable bulk price for that drug. In order to minimize state administrative costs and maximize state benefits for the rebate program, the secretary may establish a program that focuses upon obtaining rebates for those drugs that it determines are purchased by the department in relatively large volumes.

(3) If a rebate program is implemented, the department shall submit an invoice, not less than two times per year, to each manufacturer for the amount of the rebate required by this subdivision. Drugs may be removed from the list for failure to pay the rebate required by this subdivision, unless the department determines that purchase of the drug is a medical necessity or that purchase of the drug is necessary to comply with a court order to ensure the appropriate provision of quality health care to offenders in state custody.

(4) In order to minimize state administrative costs and maximize state benefits for such a rebate program, if one is implemented, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may enter into interagency agreements with the Department of General Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of State Hospitals, or the State Department of Developmental Services, the University of California, another appropriate state department, or with more than one of those entities, for joint participation in a rebate program, collection and monitoring of necessary drug price and rebate data, the billing of manufacturers for rebates, the resolution of any disputes over rebates, and any other services necessary for the cost-effective operation of the rebate program.

(5) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, separately or in cooperation with other state
 agencies, may contract for the services of a pharmaceutical benefits manager for any services necessary for the cost-effective operation of the rebate program, if one is implemented, or for other services to improve the contracting and procurement of drugs and medical supplies for inmate health care.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department, as an alternative to or in addition to establishing a rebate program for drugs for inmate health care, from implementing, in cooperation with the Department of General Services and other appropriate state agencies, other cost-effective strategies for procurement of drugs and medical supplies for offenders in state custody, including, but not limited to:

(1) Improvements in the existing statewide master agreement procedures for purchasing contract and noncontract drugs at a discount from drug manufacturers.

(2) Participation by offenders in state custody infected with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), the etiologic agent of acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS), in the AIDS Drug Assistance Program.

(3) Membership in the Minnesota Multistate Contracting Alliance for Pharmacy (MMCAP) or other cooperative purchasing arrangements with other governmental entities.

(4) Greater centralization or standardization of procurement of drugs and medical supplies among individual prisons in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation prison system.

(d) The California State Auditor’s Office shall report to the Legislature and the Governor by January 10, 2002, its findings in regard to:

(1) An
 evaluation of the trends in state costs for the procurement of drugs and medical supplies for offenders in state custody, and an assessment of the major factors affecting those trends.

(2) A summary of the steps taken by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Department of General Services, and other appropriate state agencies to implement this section.

(3) An evaluation of the compliance by these state agencies with the findings and recommendations of the January 2000 California State Auditor’s Office report for reform of procurement of drugs and medical supplies for offenders in state custody.

(4) Any further recommendations of the California State Auditor’s Office for reform of state drug procurement practices, policies, or statutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 281, Sec. 40.   (SB 1395)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.2.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is authorized to maintain and operate a comprehensive pharmacy services program for those facilities under the jurisdiction of the department that is both cost effective and efficient, and shall incorporate the following:

(1) A statewide pharmacy administration system with direct
 authority and responsibility for program administration and oversight.

(2) Medically necessary pharmacy services using professionally and legally qualified pharmacists, consistent with the size and the scope of medical services provided.

(3) Written procedures and operational practices pertaining to the delivery of pharmaceutical services.

(4) A multidisciplinary, statewide Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee responsible for all of the following:

(A) Developing and managing a department formulary.

(B) Standardizing the strengths and dosage forms for medications used in department facilities.

(C) Maintaining and monitoring a
 system for the review and evaluation of corrective actions related to errors in prescribing, dispensing, and administering medications.

(D) Conducting regular therapeutic category reviews for medications listed in the department formulary.

(E) Evaluating medication therapies and providing input to the development of disease management guidelines used in the department.

(5) A requirement for the use of generic medications, when available, unless an exception is reviewed and approved in accordance with an established nonformulary approval process. The nonformulary approval process shall include a process whereby a prescriber may indicate on the face of the prescription “dispense as written” or other appropriate form for electronic prescriptions.

(6) Use
 of an enterprise-based pharmacy operating system that provides management with information on prescription workloads, medication utilization, prescribing data, and other key pharmacy information.

(b) The department is authorized to operate and maintain a centralized pharmacy distribution center to provide advantages of scale and efficiencies related to medication purchasing, inventory control, volume production, drug distribution, workforce utilization, and increased patient safety. It is the intent of the Legislature that the centralized pharmacy distribution center and institutional pharmacies be licensed as pharmacies by the California State Board of Pharmacy meeting all applicable regulations applying to a pharmacy.

(1) To the extent it is cost effective and efficient, the centralized pharmacy distribution center should include systems to do the following:

(A) Order and package bulk pharmaceuticals and prescription and stock orders for all department correctional facilities.

(B) Label medications as required to meet state and federal prescription requirements.

(C) Provide barcode validation matching the drug to the specific prescription or floor stock order.

(D) Sort completed orders for shipping and delivery to department facilities.

(2) Notwithstanding any other requirements, the department centralized pharmacy distribution center is authorized to do the following:

(A) Package bulk pharmaceuticals into both floor stock and patient-specific packs.

(B) Reclaim, for reissue, unused and unexpired medications.

(C) Distribute the packaged products to department facilities for use within the state corrections system.

(3) The centralized pharmacy distribution center should maintain a system of quality control checks on each process used to package, label, and distribute medications. The quality control system may include a regular process of random checks by a licensed pharmacist.

(c) The department may investigate and initiate potential systematic improvements in order to provide for the safe and efficient distribution and control of, and accountability for, drugs within the department’s statewide pharmacy administration system, taking into account factors unique to the correctional environment.

(d) The department should ensure that there is a program providing for the regular inspection of all department pharmacies in the state to verify compliance with applicable law, rules, regulations, and other standards as may be appropriate to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the department’s inmate patients.

(e) On March 1, 2012, and each March 1 thereafter, the department shall report all of the following to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Senate Committee on Health, the Senate Committee on Public Safety, the Assembly Committee on Appropriations, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Assembly Committee on Health, and the Assembly Committee on Public Safety:

(1) The extent to which the Pharmacy and Therapeutics
 Committee has been established and achieved the objectives set forth in this section, as well as the most significant reasons for achieving or not achieving those objectives.
